Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-114
Change of name; continue to act.

Any person, whose name is legally changed after a commission as a notary public is issued to him or her, may continue to act as such notary public and use the original commission, seal, and name until the expiration or termination of such commission. The bond given by such notary public shall continue in effect, regardless of such legal change of name of such notary public, if the notary public uses the name under which the commission is issued.

Laws 1945, c. 145, § 13, p. 495.